Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4808
Insurer subject to delinquency proceedings; restrictions.

No insurer that is subject to any delinquency proceedings, whether formal, informal, administrative, or judicial, shall (1) be released from such proceeding unless such proceeding is converted into a judicial rehabilitation or liquidation proceeding, (2) be permitted to solicit or accept new business or request or accept the restoration of any suspended or revoked license or certificate of authority, (3) be returned to the control of its shareholders or private management, or (4) have any of its assets returned to the control of its shareholders or private management, until all payments of or on account of the insurer's contractual obligations by all guaranty associations, along with all expenses thereof and interest on all such payments and expenses, have been repaid to the guaranty associations or a plan of repayment by the insurer has been approved by the guaranty association.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 63.